Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.037

Sports wagering—Prohibited activities—Penalty.

(1) No person shall offer, promise, give, or attempt to give any thing of value to any person for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a sporting event, athletic event, or competition upon which a wager may be made.

(2) No person shall place, increase, or decrease a wager after acquiring knowledge, not available to the general public, that anyone has been offered, promised, or given any thing of value for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a sporting event, athletic event, or competition upon which the wager is placed, increased, or decreased.

(3) No person shall offer, promise, give, or attempt to give any thing of value to obtain confidential or insider information not available to the public with intent to use the information to gain a wagering advantage on a sporting event, athletic event, or competition.

(4) No person shall accept or agree to accept, any thing of value for the purpose of wrongfully influencing his or her play, action, decision making, or conduct in any sporting event, athletic event, or competition upon which a wager may be made.

(5) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a class C felony subject to the penalty set forth in RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2020 c 127 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.